Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2064.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5045YH (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 2064 Section 1. Section 483A.24, subsection 17, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 17. Upon payment of a fee established by rules adopted 3 pursuant to section 483A.1 of five dollars, and any processing 4 fee, for a lifetime fur harvester license, the department shall 5 issue a lifetime fur harvester license to a resident of Iowa 6 who has served in the armed forces of the United States on 7 federal active duty and who was disabled during that veteranâs 8 military service. The department shall prepare an application 9 to be used by a person requesting a lifetime fur harvester 10 license under this subsection . The department of veterans 11 affairs shall assist the department in verifying the status or 12 claims of applicants under this subsection . As used in this 13 subsection , âdisabledâ means entitled to a service connected 14 rating under 38 U.S.C. ch. 11. 15 Sec. 2. REFUNDS. Within thirty days of the enactment of 16 this Act, the department of natural resources shall issue a 17 refund to a resident of Iowa issued a lifetime fur harvester 18 license under section 483A.24, subsection 17, Code 2025, who 19 paid a total of greater than seven dollars in fees for a 20 lifetime fur harvester license. The amount of the refund shall 21 be the total amount paid by the resident for the lifetime fur 22 harvester license in excess of seven dollars. 23 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 24 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 25